Utah statutes.
17-21-4.   Certified copies.
(1)  The county recorder may make and furnish certified photographic copies of
any of the records in the office to an interested person who pays the
applicable fees and charges.
(2)  The county recorder shall supply certified copies of any of the records
to the county officer for the officer's official use without the payment of
any fee.
